Washington statutes.
RCW 4.56.260

Award of future economic damages—Proposal for periodic payments—Security—Satisfaction of judgment.

(1) In an action based on fault seeking damages for personal injury or property damage in which a verdict or award for future economic damages of at least one hundred thousand dollars is made, the court or arbitrator shall, at the request of a party, enter a judgment which provides for the periodic payment in whole or in part of the future economic damages. With respect to the judgment, the court or arbitrator shall make a specific finding as to the dollar amount of periodic payments intended to compensate the judgment creditor for the future economic damages.

(2) Prior to entry of judgment, the court shall request each party to submit a proposal for periodic payment of future economic damages to compensate the claimant. Proposals shall include provisions for: The name of the recipient or recipients of the payments, the dollar amount of the payments, the interval between payments, the number of payments or the period of time over which the payments shall be made, modification for hardship or unforeseen circumstances, posting of adequate security, and any other factor the court deems relevant under the circumstances. After each party has submitted a proposal, the court shall select the proposal, with any changes the court deems proper, which in the discretion of the court and the interests of justice best provides for the future needs of the claimant and enter judgment accordingly.

(3) If the court enters a judgment for periodic payments and any security required by the judgment is not posted within thirty days, the court shall enter a judgment for the payment of future damages in a lump sum.

(4) If at any time following entry of judgment for periodic payments, a judgment debtor fails for any reason to make a payment in a timely fashion according to the terms of the judgment, the judgment creditor may petition the court for an order requiring payment by the judgment debtor of the outstanding payments in a lump sum. In calculating the amount of the lump sum judgment, the court shall total the remaining periodic payments due and owing to the judgment creditor converted to present value. The court may also require payment of interest on the outstanding judgment.

(5) Upon the death of the judgment creditor, the court which rendered the original judgment may, upon petition of any party in interest, modify the judgment to award and apportion the unpaid future damages. Money damages awarded for loss of future earnings shall not be reduced or payments terminated by reason of the death of the judgment creditor.

(6) Upon satisfaction of a periodic payment judgment, any obligation of the judgment debtor to make further payments shall cease and any security posted pursuant to this section shall revert to the judgment debtor.

[ 1986 c 305 s 801.]

NOTES:

Preamble—Report to legislature—Applicability—Severability—1986 c 305: See notes following RCW 4.16.160.